District of Columbia statutes.
29-937

Compliance with chapter; not in restraint of trade.

The fact that economic activity of a limited cooperative association, a subsidiary, or a related entity, is organized under this chapter shall not in itself cause the activity to be considered a conspiracy, a combination in restraint of trade, an illegal monopoly, or an attempt to lessen competition or fix prices arbitrarily.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-842.
1981 Ed., § 29-1142.
2001 Ed., § 29-942.
This section is referenced in § 29-1001.08.